Hawaii statutes.
§560:5-209 Rights and immunities of
guardian. (a) A guardian shall be entitled to such reasonable
compensation from the ward's estate for services as guardian and to
reimbursement for room, board, and clothing provided by the guardian to the
ward, but only as is approved by the court.

(b) A guardian is not:

(1) Legally obligated to use the guardian's personal
funds for the ward's expenses;

(2) Unless otherwise provided in the contract,
individually liable on a contract properly entered into in the guardian's
representative capacity in the exercise of the duties and powers as guardian
unless the guardian fails to reveal the guardian's capacity and the identity of
the ward in the contract;

(3) Personally liable to a third person for acts of
the ward solely by reason of the guardianship; and

(4) Personally liable for injury to the ward
resulting from the negligence or act of a third person providing medical or
other care, treatment, or service to the ward except to the extent that a
parent would be liable under the circumstances. [L 2004, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next